Washington statutes.
RCW 19.210.020

Prohibited sales.

No unused property merchant shall offer at an unused property market for sale or knowingly permit the sale of baby food, infant formula, cosmetics, nonprescription drugs, or medical devices. This section does not apply to a person who keeps available for public inspection a written authorization identifying that person as an authorized representative of the manufacturer or distributor of such product, as long as the authorization is not false, fraudulent, or fraudulently obtained.

[ 2001 c 160 s 2.]